Utah statutes.
40-10-18.1.   Suspension of underground mining upon finding of immediate danger to inhabitants at surface.

In order to protect the stability of the land, the board shall suspend underground coal mining under urbanized areas, cities, towns, and communities and adjacent to industrial or commercial buildings, major impoundments, or permanent streams if, after proper notice and hearing, there is a finding of imminent danger to inhabitants of the urbanized areas, cities, towns, and communities.



Enacted by Chapter 49, 1997 General Session

